Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of St. Paul to work in consultation with the West Side Community Organization on economic development and job retention efforts for businesses employing the equivalent of ten or less full-time employees. Grant money may be used for: technical assistance; establishing revolving loan funds; issuing loans, including no interest and forgivable loans; and grants to small businesses for operating expenses. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of West St. Paul to work in consultation with the Residents of Color Collective on economic development and job retention efforts for businesses employing the equivalent of ten or less full-time employees. Grant money may be used for: technical assistance; establishing revolving loan funds; issuing loans, including no interest and forgivable loans; and grants to small businesses for operating expenses. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end